New Jersey, session 222, S1070.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   Every new or used school bus, purchased or otherwise acquired on or after the first day of the 37th month following the date of enactment of P.L.    , c.   (C.       ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall be equipped with a video camera to assist in the enforcement of section 1 of P.L.1942, c.192 (C.39:4-128.1).  The video cameras shall be of a design and type approved by the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission, and shall be installed on or adjacent to the vehicles crossing control arm, equipped pursuant to P.L.1996, c.96 (C.39:3B-1.1 et seq.). Following the date of enactment of P.L.    , c.   (C.       ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), any school bus equipped with a video camera shall be used to transport elementary school students whenever practicable. b.    Thirty-seven months after the date of enactment of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), each agency, board of education, nonpublic school, and school bus contractor shall submit to the Commissioner of Education a list of vehicles, as defined in section 1 of P.L.1996, c.96 (C.39:3B-1.1), used to transport students and indicate whether each vehicle is equipped with a video camera on or adjacent to the crossing control arm. c.     For the purposes of this section, school bus means any vehicle equipped with a crossing control arm, pursuant to P.L.1996, c.96 (C.39:3B-1.1 et seq.). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.